District of Columbia statutes.
46-356.01

Registration of order for enforcement.

A support order or income-withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order may be registered in the District for enforcement.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 601, 63 DCR 222

History